Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 634.705 is amended to read:
634.705. (1)(a) The governing body responsible for a  school shall adopt an integrated pest man-
agement plan for  use on the campuses of the school. The governing body shall also adopt provisions
for:
[(a)] (A)  Designating an integrated pest management plan coordinator;
[(b)] (B)  Identifying plan coordinator responsibilities;
[(c)] (C) Giving notices under ORS 634.740;
[(d)] (D)  Retaining pesticide application records under ORS 634.750;
[(e)] (E)  Providing a process for responding to inquiries and complaints about  noncompliance
with the integrated pest management plan; and
[(f)] (F)  Conducting outreach to the school  community about the school’s integrated pest man-
agement plan.
(b) Not less than once every five years, the governing body shall review the  integrated
pest management plan, make any necessary updates  and readopt the integrated pest man-
agement plan. A final integrated pest management plan must include  the day, month and
year that the governing body adopted or readopted the plan.
(c) A governing body shall make the  integrated pest management plan available to the
public through the governing body’s website.  A governing body may satisfy this paragraph
by including the integrated pest management plan with the  Healthy and Safe Schools Plan,
adopted under ORS 332.331, posted on the governing body’s website.
(2) If a governing body has control over only  part of a building, a structure or property where
a campus is  located, the governing body may limit an integrated pest management plan to those
parts of the building, structure or property over  which the governing body exerts substantial con-
trol.
(3) A  governing body is not required to adopt an integrated pest management plan for off-campus
buildings, structures or property, notwithstanding any incidental use for instruction.
(4) Unless a governing body expressly provides otherwise, the application of a  germicide,
disinfectant, sanitizer, deodorizer, antimicrobial  agent or insecticidal soap at a campus is not subject
to the requirements for a pesticide application under an integrated pest  management plan. However,
this subsection does not permit the application  at a campus of a germicide, disinfectant, sanitizer,
Enrolled House Bill 2684 (HB 2684-B) Page 1
deodorizer, antimicrobial agent or insecticidal soap that is a  pesticide in a manner that is incon-
sistent with the goal of the integrated pest management plan.
(5)(a) A governing body shall adopt a list of low-impact pesticides  for use with the integrated
pest management plan.
(b) A governing body shall make the list of low-impact pesticides available to the  public
through the governing body’s website. A governing body  may satisfy this paragraph by in-
cluding the list of low-impact pesticides with the Healthy and  Safe Schools Plan, adopted
under ORS 332.331, posted on the governing body’s website.
(c) The [ governing body ] list of low-impact pesticides  may include any product [ on the list ]
except products that:
[(a)] (A)  Contain a pesticide product or active ingredient that has  the signal words “warning”
or “danger” on the label;
[(b)] (B)  Contain a pesticide product classified as a  human carcinogen or probable human
carcinogen under the United States Environmental Protection Agency 1986  Guidelines for
Carcinogen Risk Assessment; or
[(c)] (C)  Contain a pesticide product classified  as carcinogenic to humans or likely to be
carcinogenic to humans under the United  States Environmental Protection Agency 2003 Draft Final
Guidelines for Carcinogen Risk Assessment.
SECTION 2. For integrated pest management plans adopted  before the effective date of
this 2025 Act, a governing body shall review, update and  readopt the integrated pest man-
agement plan, as required by ORS 634.705 (1)(b), no later than January 1, 2027,  or five years
from the date of the most recent approval of the plan, whichever is later.
SECTION 3.  ORS 634.700 is amended to read:
634.700. As used in ORS 634.700 to 634.750:
(1) “Campus” means the buildings, other  structures, playgrounds, athletic fields , school gardens
and parking  lots of a school and any other areas on the school property that are accessed by stu-
dents on a regular basis.
(2) “Governing body” means  a board of directors, agency or other body or person having
policymaking and general oversight responsibility for a community college district, education service
district, school district,  other unit of education governance, private school or other educational en-
tity.
(3) “Integrated pest management plan” means a proactive strategy that:
(a) Focuses on the long-term prevention  or suppression of pest problems through economically
sound measures that:
(A) Protect the health and safety of students, staff and faculty;
(B) Protect the integrity of campus buildings and grounds;
(C) Maintain a productive learning environment; and
(D) Protect local ecosystem health;
(b) Focuses  on the prevention of pest problems by working to reduce or eliminate conditions of
property construction, operation and maintenance that promote or allow  for the establishment,
feeding, breeding and proliferation of pest populations or other conditions that  are conducive to
pests or that create harborage for pests;
(c) Incorporates the use of  sanitation, structural remediation or habitat manipulation or of me-
chanical,  biological  and chemical pest control measures that present a reduced risk or have a low
impact and,  for the purpose of mitigating a declared pest emergency, the application of pesticides
that are not low-impact pesticides;
(d) Includes regular monitoring and inspections  to detect pests, pest damage and unsanctioned
pesticide  usage;
(e) Evaluates the need for pest control by identifying acceptable pest population density levels;
(f) Monitors and evaluates the effectiveness of pest control measures;
(g) Excludes the application of pesticides on a routine schedule  for purely preventive purposes,
other than applications of pesticides designed to attract or be consumed by pests;
Enrolled House Bill 2684 (HB 2684-B) Page 2
(h) Excludes the application of pesticides for purely aesthetic purposes;
(i) Includes school staff education about sanitation, monitoring and  inspection and about pest
control measures;
(j) Gives preference to the use of nonchemical pest control measures;
(k) Allows the use  of low-impact pesticides if nonchemical pest control measures are ineffective;
and
(L) Allows the application of a pesticide that is not a low-impact pesticide only to  mitigate a
declared pest emergency or if the application is by,  or at the direction or order of, a public health
official.
(4) “Low-impact pesticide” means a product that does not contain a pesticide  product or active
ingredient described in ORS 634.705 (5).
(5) “Pest” means:
(a) An insect or other arthropod;
(b) A weed, moss, slime or mildew or a plant disease caused by a fungus, bacterium or virus;
(c) A nematode, snail, slug, rodent or predatory animal;
(d) A bacterium, spore, virus, fungus or  other microorganism that is harmful to human health;
or
(e) Other forms of plant or animal life that may infest or be detrimental to vegetation, humans,
animals, structures, managed landscapes or other human environments.
(6) “Pest emergency” means an urgent need to eliminate or  mitigate a pest situation that
threatens:
(a) The health or safety of students, staff, faculty members or members of the public using  the
campus; or
(b) The structural integrity of campus facilities.
(7) “Registration number” means the pesticide registration number assigned by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency.
(8) “School” means:
(a) A federal Head Start program or a provider under the Oregon Prenatal to  Kindergarten
Program;
(b) A public  or private educational institution offering education in all or part of kindergarten
through grade 12;
(c) An education service district as defined in ORS 334.003;
(d) A community college as  defined in ORS 341.005, for the community college’s own buildings
and ground maintenance;
(e) The Oregon School for the Deaf; and
(f) A regional residential academy operated by the Oregon Youth Authority.
Enrolled House Bill 2684 (HB 2684-B) Page 3
Passed by House April 2, 2025
Repassed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2684 (HB 2684-B) Page 4